test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_kielas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - kiärun: # 2B 3KIELES
    kiärun+N+Sg+Nom: kiärun 
    kiärun+N+Sg+Gen: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Acc: kiärrun
    kiärun+N+Sg+Ill: kiärunân
    kiärun+N+Sg+Loc: kiärunist
    kiärun+N+Sg+Com: kiärunáin
    kiärun+N+Sg+Abe: kiärrunttáá
    kiärun+N+Ess: kiärunin # r7 is not the same pattern as other NAVER stems
    kiärun+N+Par: kiärunid # r7 is not the same pattern as other NAVER stems
    kiärun+N+Pl+Nom: kiäruneh
    kiärun+N+Pl+Gen: kiärunij
    kiärun+N+Pl+Acc: kiärunijd
    kiärun+N+Pl+Ill: kiärunáid
    kiärun+N+Pl+Loc: kiärunijn
    kiärun+N+Pl+Com: [kiärunijguin, kiärunijgijn]
    kiärun+N+Pl+Abe: kiärunijttáá


  Noun - kielâs: # 2A 3KIELES
    kielâs+N+Sg+Nom: kielâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Gen: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Acc: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Ill: kielâsân
    kielâs+N+Sg+Loc: kielâsist
    kielâs+N+Sg+Com: kielâsáin
    kielâs+N+Sg+Abe: kiellâsttáá
    kielâs+N+Ess: kielâsin # l7 is not the same pattern as other NAVER stems
    kielâs+N+Par: kielâsid # l7 is not the same pattern as other NAVER stems
    kielâs+N+Pl+Nom: kielâseh
    kielâs+N+Pl+Gen: kielâsij
    kielâs+N+Pl+Acc: kielâsijd
    kielâs+N+Pl+Ill: kielâsáid
    kielâs+N+Pl+Loc: kielâsijn
    kielâs+N+Pl+Com: [kielâsijguin, kielâsijgijn]   
    kielâs+N+Pl+Abe: kielâsijttáá   

  Noun - kieles: # MLO, ok; subst + adj 3KIELES
    kieles+N+Sg+Nom: kieles
    kieles+N+Sg+Gen: kiällás
    kieles+N+Sg+Acc: kiällás
    kieles+N+Sg+Ill: kiälásân
    kieles+N+Sg+Loc: kiälásist
    kieles+N+Sg+Com: kiälásáin
    kieles+N+Sg+Abe: kiällásttáá
    kieles+N+Ess: kielesin
    kieles+N+Par: kielesid
    kieles+N+Pl+Nom: kiäláseh
    kieles+N+Pl+Gen: kiälásij
    kieles+N+Pl+Acc: kiälásijd
    kieles+N+Pl+Ill: kiälásáid
    kieles+N+Pl+Loc: kiälásijn
    kieles+N+Pl+Com: [kiälásijguin, kiälásijgijn]
    kieles+N+Pl+Abe: kiälásijttáá

  Noun - peles: # MLO, ok 3PELES
    peles+N+Sg+Nom: peles
    peles+N+Sg+Gen: [piällás, piällá]
    peles+N+Sg+Acc: [piällás, piällá]
    peles+N+Sg+Ill: [piälásân, piällás]
    peles+N+Sg+Loc: [piälásist, piällást]
    peles+N+Sg+Com: [piälásáin, piälláin]
    peles+N+Sg+Abe: [piällásttáá, piälláttáá]
    peles+N+Ess: pelesin
    peles+N+Par: pelesid
    peles+N+Pl+Nom: [piäláseh, piälláh]
    peles+N+Pl+Gen: [piälásij, piällái]
    peles+N+Pl+Acc: [piälásijd, piälláid]
    peles+N+Pl+Ill: [piälásáid, piälláid]
    peles+N+Pl+Loc: [piälásijn, piälláin]
    peles+N+Pl+Com: [piälásijguin, piälásijgijn, piälláiguin, piälláigijn]
    peles+N+Pl+Abe: [piälásijttáá, piälláittáá]
